Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,215
Department of Motor Vehicles; Department of Revenue; notifications required.

(1) If a debtor identified by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 77-27,214 is determined by the Department of Revenue to be entitled to a refund of twenty-five dollars or more, the Department of Revenue shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles that a refund is pending.

(2) Upon receipt of the notification, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall, within twenty days, send written notification to the debtor of an assertion of its rights to all or a portion of the debtor's refund.

(3) The notification to the debtor shall clearly set forth the basis for the claim to the refund, the intention to apply the refund against the debt, the debtor's opportunity to give written notice of intent to contest the validity of the claim before the Department of Motor Vehicles within twenty days after the date of the mailing of the notice, the mailing address to which the application for a hearing must be sent, and notice that failure to apply for a hearing in writing within the twenty-day period will be deemed a waiver of the opportunity to contest the claim, causing a setoff by default. In the case of a joint income tax return, the notice shall also state the name of the taxpayer named in the return against whom no debt is claimed. There shall be no affirmative duty placed upon the non-owing spouse to initiate an action to receive payment of the noninterceptable amount.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 30.